Utah statutes.
16-16-514.   Voting requirements for members.
(1)  If a limited cooperative association has both patron and investor
members, the following rules apply:
(a)  the total voting power of all patron members may not be less than a
majority of the entire voting power entitled to vote; and
(b)  action on any matter is approved only upon the affirmative vote of at
least a majority of:
(i)  all members voting at the meeting unless more than a majority is required
by this chapter or the organic rules; and
(ii)  votes cast by patron members unless the organic rules require a larger
affirmative vote by patron members.
(2)  The organic rules may provide for the percentage of the affirmative votes
that must be cast by investor members to approve the matter.
